Hawaii statutes.
§480E-2.5
Mortgage rescue fraud; consumer education. The
office of consumer protection shall educate consumers about abusive practices
that may be committed against consumers who may be offered mortgage assistance
relief services or who face property foreclosures, liens, or encumbrances, as
appropriate. [L 2012, c 183, pt of §1; am L
2016, c 142, §4]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next